Illinois, session 104th, HB4390.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Pension 5Equity Act. 6    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 7changing Section 7-142.1 as follows: 8    (40 ILCS 5/7-142.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-142.1)9    Sec. 7-142.1. Sheriff's law enforcement employees. 10    (a) In lieu of the retirement annuity provided by 11subparagraph 1 of paragraph (a) of Section 7-142: 12    Any sheriff's law enforcement employee who has 20 or more 13years of service in that capacity and who terminates service 14prior to January 1, 1988 shall be entitled at his option to 15receive a monthly retirement annuity for his service as a 16sheriff's law enforcement employee computed by multiplying 2% 17for each year of such service up to 10 years, 2 1/4% for each 18year of such service above 10 years and up to 20 years, and 2 191/2% for each year of such service above 20 years, by his 20annual final rate of earnings and dividing by 12. 21    Any sheriff's law enforcement employee who has 20 or more 22years of service in that capacity and who terminates service   HB4390- 2 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1on or after January 1, 1988 and before July 1, 2004 shall be 2entitled at his option to receive a monthly retirement annuity 3for his service as a sheriff's law enforcement employee 4computed by multiplying 2.5% for each year of such service up 5to 20 years, 2% for each year of such service above 20 years 6and up to 30 years, and 1% for each year of such service above 730 years, by his annual final rate of earnings and dividing by 812. 9    Any sheriff's law enforcement employee who has 20 or more 10years of service in that capacity and who terminates service 11on or after July 1, 2004 shall be entitled at his or her option 12to receive a monthly retirement annuity for service as a 13sheriff's law enforcement employee computed by multiplying 142.5% for each year of such service by his annual final rate of 15earnings and dividing by 12. 16    If a sheriff's law enforcement employee has service in any 17other capacity, his retirement annuity for service as a 18sheriff's law enforcement employee may be computed under this 19Section and the retirement annuity for his other service under 20Section 7-142. 21    In no case shall the total monthly retirement annuity for 22persons who retire before July 1, 2004 exceed 75% of the 23monthly final rate of earnings. In no case shall the total 24monthly retirement annuity for persons who retire on or after 25July 1, 2004 exceed 80% of the monthly final rate of earnings. 26    (b) Whenever continued group insurance coverage is elected   HB4390- 3 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1in accordance with the provisions of Section 367h of the 2Illinois Insurance Code, as now or hereafter amended, the 3total monthly premium for such continued group insurance 4coverage or such portion thereof as is not paid by the 5municipality shall, upon request of the person electing such 6continued group insurance coverage, be deducted from any 7monthly pension benefit otherwise payable to such person 8pursuant to this Section, to be remitted by the Fund to the 9insurance company or other entity providing the group 10insurance coverage. 11    (c) A sheriff's law enforcement employee who began service 12in that capacity prior to the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly and who has 14service in any other capacity may convert up to 10 years of 15that service into service as a sheriff's law enforcement 16employee by paying to the Fund an amount equal to (1) the 17additional employee contribution required under Section 187-173.1, plus (2) the additional employer contribution 19required under Section 7-172, plus (3) interest on items (1) 20and (2) at the prescribed rate from the date of the service to 21the date of payment. Application must be received by the Board 22while the employee is an active participant in the Fund. 23Payment must be received while the member is an active 24participant, except that one payment will be permitted after 25termination of participation. 26    (d) The changes to subsections (a) and (b) of this Section   HB4390- 4 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1made by this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly apply 2only to persons in service on or after July 1, 2004. In the 3case of such a person who begins to receive a retirement 4annuity before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 5the 94th General Assembly, the annuity shall be recalculated 6prospectively to reflect those changes, with the resulting 7increase beginning to accrue on the first annuity payment date 8following the effective date of this amendatory Act. 9    (e) Any elected county officer who was entitled to receive 10a stipend from the State on or after July 1, 2009 and on or 11before June 30, 2010 may establish earnings credit for the 12amount of stipend not received, if the elected county official 13applies in writing to the fund within 6 months after the 14effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 15Assembly and pays to the fund an amount equal to (i) employee 16contributions on the amount of stipend not received, (ii) 17employer contributions determined by the Board equal to the 18employer's normal cost of the benefit on the amount of stipend 19not received, plus (iii) interest on items (i) and (ii) at the 20actuarially assumed rate. 21    (f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 22the provisions of this subsection (f) apply to a person who 23first becomes a sheriff's law enforcement employee under this 24Article on or after January 1, 2011.25    A sheriff's law enforcement employee age 55 or more who 26has 10 or more years of service in that capacity shall be   HB4390- 5 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1entitled at his option to receive a monthly retirement annuity 2for his or her service as a sheriff's law enforcement employee 3computed by multiplying 2.5% for each year of such service by 4his or her final rate of earnings.5    The retirement annuity of a sheriff's law enforcement 6employee who is retiring after attaining age 50 with 10 or more 7years of creditable service shall be reduced by one-half of 1% 8for each month that the sheriff's law enforcement employee's 9age is under age 55.10    The maximum retirement annuity under this subsection (f) 11shall be 75% of final rate of earnings.12    For the purposes of this subsection (f), "final rate of 13earnings" means the average monthly earnings obtained by 14dividing the total salary of the sheriff's law enforcement 15employee during the 96 consecutive months of service within 16the last 120 months of service in which the total earnings was 17the highest by the number of months of service in that period. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 19beginning on January 1, 2011 and until January 1, 2027, for all 20purposes under this Code (including without limitation the 21calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 22annual earnings of a sheriff's law enforcement employee to 23whom this Section applies shall not include overtime and shall 24not exceed $106,800; however, that amount shall annually 25thereafter be increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, 26including all previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the   HB4390- 6 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not less than zero) 2in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 3September preceding each November 1, including all previous 4adjustments. 5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 6beginning on January 1, 2027, for all purposes under this Code 7(including without limitation the calculation of benefits and 8employee contributions), the annual earnings of a sheriff's 9law enforcement employee to whom this Section applies shall 10not include overtime and shall not exceed $145,649.97 plus the 11lesser of (i) 3% of that amount or (ii) the annual unadjusted 12percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 13price index-u for the 12 months ending with September 2026; 14however, beginning on January 1 2028, that amount shall 15annually thereafter be increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of 16that amount, including all previous adjustments, or (ii) the 17annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not less than zero) 18in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 19September preceding each November 1, including all previous 20adjustments. 21    As soon as practical on or after the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, with regard to 23benefits earned for the years 2012 through 2026, the Fund 24shall recalculate benefits for sheriff's law enforcement 25employees to whom this Section applies based on the annual 26salary limitation that was in effect for that year under   HB4390- 7 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1subsection (d) of Section 3-111.2    Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 104th General 3Assembly shall cause or otherwise result in any retroactive 4adjustment of any employee contributions. The changes made to 5this Section by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 6Assembly apply without regard to whether the sheriff's law 7enforcement employee was in service on or after the effective 8date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.9    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 10the monthly annuity of a person who first becomes a sheriff's 11law enforcement employee under this Article on or after 12January 1, 2011 shall be increased on the January 1 occurring 13either on or after the attainment of age 60 or the first 14anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever is later. 15Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or one-half the 16annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not less than zero) 17in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 18September preceding each November 1, whichever is less, of the 19originally granted retirement annuity. If the annual 20unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price index-u for 21a 12-month period ending in September is zero or, when 22compared with the preceding period, decreases, then the 23annuity shall not be increased. 24    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 25for a person who first becomes a sheriff's law enforcement 26employee under this Article on or after January 1, 2011, the   HB4390- 8 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1annuity to which the surviving spouse, children, or parents 2are entitled under this subsection (h) shall be in the amount 3of 66 2/3% of the sheriff's law enforcement employee's earned 4annuity at the date of death.5    (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 6the monthly annuity of a survivor of a person who first becomes 7a sheriff's law enforcement employee under this Article on or 8after January 1, 2011 shall be increased on the January 1 after 9attainment of age 60 by the recipient of the survivor's 10annuity and each January 1 thereafter by 3% or one-half the 11annual unadjusted percentage increase in the consumer price 12index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 13each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 14pension. If the annual unadjusted percentage change in the 15consumer price index-u for a 12-month period ending in 16September is zero or, when compared with the preceding period, 17decreases, then the annuity shall not be increased. 18    (j) For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price 19index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 20Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 21measures the average change in prices of goods and services 22purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 23all items, 1982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each 24annual adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension 25Division of the Department of Insurance and made available to 26the boards of the pension funds.   HB4390- 9 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1(Source: P.A. 100-148, eff. 8-18-17.) 2    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 3Section 8.50 as follows: 4    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)5    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 68 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 7the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 8Act of the 104th General Assembly. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.  HB4390- 10 -LRB104 16796 RPS 30205 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    40 ILCS 5/7-142.1from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-142.14    30 ILCS 805/8.50 new